Washington statutes.
RCW 36.72.080

Forms for public blanks, compilation of.

The state auditor, with the aid and advice of the attorney general shall compile the forms for all public blanks used in the counties of this state in conformity with the general statutes thereof. The various blanks shall be uniform throughout the state.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.72.080. Prior: 1897 c 35 s 1; RRS s 4078.]